Connecticut, session 2026, SB00480.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section, (1)
"electronic benefit transfer card" means a card through which recipients
of supplemental nutrition assistance and other state-administered
benefit programs access benefits, and (2) "security chip technology"
means technology that generates a unique, one-time encrypted code for
each transaction on a credit card. The Commissioner of Social Services,
within available appropriations, shall upgrade electronic benefit
transfer cards to utilize security chip technology to help track and
prevent potentially fraudulent uses of such cards.
(b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Social
Services shall file a report, in accordance with the provisions of section
11-4a of the general statutes, with the joint standing committee of the
sSB480 / File No. 371 1

sSB480 File No. 371
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to human
services on (1) implementation of the new security chip technology, and
(2) any measurable effect on fraud prevention in the use of electronic
benefit transfer cards.
Sec. 2. Section 4-274 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
As used in this section and section 4-275:
(1) "Knowing" and "knowingly" means that a person, with respect to
information: (A) Has actual knowledge of the information; (B) acts in
deliberate ignorance of the truth or falsity of the information; or (C) acts
in reckless disregard of the truth or falsity of the information, without
regard to whether the person intends to defraud;
(2) "Claim" (A) means any request or demand, whether under a
contract or otherwise, for money or property and whether or not the
state has title to the money or property, that (i) is presented to an officer,
employee or agent of the state, or (ii) is made to a contractor, grantee or
other recipient, if the money or property is to be spent or used on the
state's behalf or to advance a state program or interest, and if the state
provides or has provided any portion of the money or property that is
requested or demanded, or if the state will reimburse such contractor,
grantee or other recipient for any portion of the money or property that
is requested or demanded, and (B) does not include a request or demand
for money or property that the state has paid to an individual as
compensation for state employment or as an income subsidy with no
restrictions on that individual's use of the money or property;
(3) "Person" means any [natural person] individual, including, but
not limited to, a public servant, as defined in section 53a-146, as
amended by this act, corporation, limited liability company, firm,
association, organization, partnership, business, trust or other legal
entity;
(4) "State" means the state of Connecticut, any agency or department
sSB480 / File No. 371 2

sSB480 File No. 371
of the state or any quasi-public agency, as defined in section 1-120;
(5) "Obligation" means an established duty, whether fixed or not,
arising from (A) an express or implied contractual, grantor-grantee or
licensor-licensee relationship, (B) a fee-based or similar relationship, (C)
statute or regulation, or (D) the retention of an overpayment; and
(6) "Material" means having a natural tendency to influence, or be
capable of influencing, the payment or receipt of money or property.
Sec. 3. Section 53a-146 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
For purposes of this part:
(1) An "official proceeding" is any proceeding held or which may be
held before any legislative, judicial, administrative or other agency or
official authorized to take evidence under oath, including any referee,
hearing examiner, commissioner or notary or other person taking
evidence in connection with any proceeding.
(2) "Benefit" means monetary advantage, or anything regarded by the
beneficiary as a monetary advantage, including benefit to any person or
entity in whose welfare the beneficiary is interested.
(3) "Public servant" is an officer or employee of government,
including the federal government, or a quasi-public agency, as defined
in section 1-120, elected or appointed, and any person participating as
advisor, consultant or otherwise, paid or unpaid, in performing a
governmental function.
(4) "Government" includes any branch, subdivision or agency of the
state or any locality within it.
(5) "Labor official" means any duly appointed or elected
representative of a labor organization or any duly appointed or elected
trustee or representative of an employee welfare trust fund.
(6) "Witness" is any person summoned, or who may be summoned,
sSB480 / File No. 371 3

sSB480 File No. 371
to give testimony in an official proceeding.
(7) "Juror" is any person who has been drawn or summoned to serve
or act as a juror in any court.
(8) "Physical evidence" means any article, object, document, record or
other thing of physical substance which is or is about to be produced or
used as evidence in an official proceeding.
(9) "Person selected to be a public servant" means any person who
has been nominated or appointed to be a public servant.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 4-274
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 53a-146
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
The title changed; and in Section 2(3) "natural person" was changed to
"[natural person] individual".
HS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB480 / File No. 371 4

sSB480 File No. 371
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Cost Approximately Approximately
4.6 million 620,000
Resources of the General GF - Revenue Approximately None
Fund Gain 1.5 million
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Department of Social Services (DSS) of
approximately $4.6 million in FY 27 and $620,000 in FY 28 to upgrade
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) and other state-
administered electronic benefit transfer (EBT) cards with security chip
technology.
FY 27 state costs include: 1) $1 million in one-time expenditures to
issue new EBT cards to all current cardholders; 2) $3 million for DSS
system modifications (with a corresponding federal grants revenue gain
of $1.5 million); 3) $470,000 for the ongoing replacement of lost or stolen
cards; 4) and $150,000 for summer EBT issuance.
FY 28 costs include the ongoing $470,000 for the replacement of lost
or stolen cards and $150,000 for summer EBT card issuance.
For reference, DSS has approximately 204,000 active EBT
cardholders. In FY 25, the department issued 156,000 replacement cards
due to loss or damage and provided an additional 30,000 cards for the
sSB480 / File No. 371 5

sSB480 File No. 371
summer EBT program.
The bill also requires DSS to report on the implementation and fraud-
prevention impact of new security chip technology by January 1, 2027
and includes various technical and clarifying changes, both of which
have no fiscal impact.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation and card issuances.
sSB480 / File No. 371 6

sSB480 File No. 371
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 480
AN ACT CONCERNING PREVENTING FRAUD IN THE
SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM AND
EXPRESSLY EXTENDING FRAUD AND CORRUPTION PENALTIES
TO PUBLIC SERVANTS.